Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1541
List of voters book; prohibited acts; penalty.

Any person who willfully, knowingly, and with fraudulent intent inscribes, writes, or causes to be inscribed or written in or upon any list of voters book the name of any person not entitled to vote at such election shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 440.